Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5843.
people of the state of michigan enact: 1 2 3 part 1 line-item appropriations FOR FISCAL YEAR 2025-2026 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Sec. 101. There is appropriated for the various state departments and agencies, the judicial branch, and the legislative branch described in this part for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2026, from the following funds: APPROPRIATION SUMMARY Full-time equated classified positions 3.0 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 5,725,000 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 0 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 5,725,000 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 0 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 0 Total private revenues 0 Total other state restricted revenues 0 State general fund/general purpose $ 5,725,000 Sec. 102. DEPARTMENT OF MILITARY AND VETERANS AFFAIRS (1) APPROPRIATION SUMMARY Full-time equated classified positions 3.0 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 5,725,000 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 0 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 5,725,000 Federal revenues: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Total federal revenues 0 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 0 Total private revenues 0 Total other state restricted revenues 0 State general fund/general purpose $ 5,725,000 (2) MICHIGAN VETERANS AFFAIRS AGENCY Full-time equated classified positions 3.0 State veterans cemetery--FTEs 3.0 $ 625,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 625,000 Appropriated from: State general fund/general purpose $ 625,000 (3) ONE-TIME APPROPRIATIONS State veterans cemetery location analysis and feasibility study 100,000 Upper Peninsula veterans cemetery fund 5,000,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 5,100,000 Appropriated from: State general fund/general purpose $ 5,100,000 PART 2 PROVISIONS CONCERNING APPROPRIATIONS FOR FISCAL YEAR 2025-2026 GENERAL SECTIONS Sec. 201. In accordance with section 30 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963, for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2026, total state spending from state sources under part 1 is $5,725,000.00 and total state spending from state sources under part 1 to be paid to local units of government is $0.00. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Sec. 202. The appropriations under this part and part 1 are subject to the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1101 to 18.1594. Sec. 203. If the state administrative board, acting under section 3 of 1921 PA 2, MCL 17.3, transfers funds from an amount appropriated under this part or part 1, the legislature may, by a concurrent resolution adopted by a majority of the members elected to and serving in each house, inter-transfer funds for the particular department, board, commission, officer, or institution. DEPARTMENT OF MILITARY AND VETERANS AFFAIRS Sec. 301. (1) Funds appropriated in part 1 for state veterans cemetery must be used to support costs of the following FTE positions: (a) Cemetery director - 0.5 position. (b) Groundskeeper - 1.5 position. (c) Administrative staff - 1.0 position. (2) As used in this section, "FTE" means full-time equated. Sec. 302. (1) Funds appropriated in part 1 for state veterans cemetery location analysis and feasibility study must be used by the Michigan veterans affairs agency to conduct a location analysis and feasibility study to determine the best location for a state veterans cemetery in the Upper Peninsula of this state in the manner provided in section 3 of the Upper Peninsula veterans cemetery act. The agency may not contract, delegate, or otherwise assign the location analysis and feasibility study in a manner that removes the agency as the primary decision-making authority. (2) As used in this section, "Michigan veterans affairs agency" or "agency" means the agency created by Executive 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 Reorganization Order No. 2013-2, MCL 32.92. Sec. 303. (1) Funds appropriated in part 1 for Upper Peninsula veterans cemetery fund must be deposited in the Upper Peninsula veterans cemetery fund created in section 5 of the Upper Peninsula veterans cemetery act. Money deposited in the Upper Peninsula veterans cemetery fund under this section is appropriated and available for use for the purposes described in section 5 of the Upper Peninsula veterans cemetery act. (2) The unexpended funds appropriated in part 1 for Upper Peninsula veterans cemetery fund are designated as a work project appropriation. Any unencumbered or unallotted funds shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal year and shall be available for expenditures for projects under this section until the projects have been completed. The following is in compliance with section 451a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1451a: (a) The purpose of the project is to establish and operate a veterans cemetery in the Upper Peninsula of this state. (b) The project will be accomplished by utilizing state employees or contracts. (c) The total estimated cost of the project is $5,000,000.00. (d) The tentative completion date is September 30, 2030. Sec. 304. Funds appropriated in part 1 for state veterans cemetery, state veterans cemetery location analysis and feasibility study, and Upper Peninsula veterans cemetery fund must not be spent or otherwise distributed unless Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S04867'25) or House Bill No. 5844 (request no. H04867'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.